Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF861.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COUNTY FAIR GRANTS.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of agriculture for grants to county agricultural societies to enhance arts access and education and to preserve and promote Minnesota's history and cultural heritage as embodied in its county fairs. The grants must be distributed in equal amounts to each of the 95 county fairs. The grants are in addition to the aid distribution to county agricultural societies under Minnesota Statutes, section 38.02. The commissioner of agriculture must develop grant-making criteria and guidance for grants under this section to provide funding for projects and events that provide access to the arts or the state's agricultural, historical, and cultural heritage. The commissioner must seek input from all interested parties. new text end